District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.14

Repealed

Shares — Issuance of preferred or special classes in series.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 185, ch. 269, § 14
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 4
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 240, Pub. L. 86-106, § 2
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(h), 39 DCR 4863
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(g), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.14.
1981 Ed., § 29-314.
1973 Ed., § 29-908a.